New York, session 2025-2026, S2420.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 300 of the multiple dwelling law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision 9 to read as follows: 3 9. The department shall not issue a permit for the construction of a 4 new multiple dwelling unless the multiple dwelling contains the minimum 5 number of dwelling units required for the lot or lots on which the 6 multiple dwelling will be constructed. The minimum number of dwelling 7 units required shall be the lesser of: 8 a. the total number of dwelling units in all buildings that existed on 9 the lot or lots prior to any such building's demolition for the 10 construction of the new multiple dwelling, including any units that had 11 been a dwelling unit at any time but were converted to non-residential 12 use; or 13 b. the maximum number of dwelling units that would be permitted by 14 relevant local zoning and building codes. 15 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to any 16 applications for permits filed or pending on or after such effective 17 date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06092-01-5